Georgia statutes. TITLE 13 Contracts
Article 2 Retention of Contractual Payments and
Creation of Escrow Accounts on
Contracts for Installation,
Improvement, Maintenance,
or Repair of Water or
Sewer Facilities

13-10-80.
Definitions; contract requirements; application; effect of greater benefits contracted for; evidence of indebtedness paid.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Contractor” means a person having a direct contract with the owner.

“Lower tier subcontractor” means a person other than a contractor having a direct contract with a subcontractor.

“Owner” means the state, any county, municipal corporation, authority, board of education, or other public board, public body, department, agency, instrumentality, or political subdivision of the state.

“Owner’s authorized contract representative” means the architect or engineer in charge of the project for the owner or such other contract representative or officer as designated in the contract documents as the party representing the owner’s interest regarding administration and oversight of the project.

“Subcontractor” means a person other than an owner having a direct contract with the contractor.

In any public works construction contract entered into on or after July 1, 2001, with an owner, as defined in paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of this Code section, such contract shall provide for the following:

After work has commenced at the construction site, progress payments to be made on some periodic basis, and at least monthly, based on the value of work completed as may be provided in the contract documents plus the value of materials and equipment suitably stored, insured, and protected at the construction site and at the owner’s discretion such materials and equipment suitably stored, insured, and protected off site at a location approved by the owner’s authorized contract representative when allowed by the contract documents, less retainage; and

Retainage to a maximum of 10 percent of each progress payment; provided, however, when 50 percent of the contract value including change orders and other additions to the contract value provided for by the contract documents is due and the manner of completion of the contract work and its progress are reasonably satisfactory to the owner’s authorized contract representative, the owner shall withhold no more retainage. At the discretion of the owner and with the approval of the contractor, the retainage of each subcontractor may be released separately as the subcontractor completes his or her work.

If, after discontinuing the retention, the owner’s authorized contract representative determines that the work is unsatisfactory or has fallen behind schedule, retention may be resumed at the previous level. If retention is resumed by an owner, the contractor and subcontractors shall be entitled to resume withholding retainage accordingly.

At substantial completion of the work or such other standard of completion as may be provided in the contract documents and as the owner’s authorized contract representative determines the work to be reasonably satisfactory, the owner shall, within 30 days after invoice and other appropriate documentation as may be required by the contract documents are provided, pay the retainage to the contractor. If at that time there are any remaining incomplete minor items, an amount equal to 200 percent of the value of each item as determined by the owner’s authorized contract representative shall be withheld until such item or items are completed. The reduced retainage shall be shared by the contractor and subcontractors as their interests may appear.

The contractor shall, within ten days from the contractor’s receipt of retainage from the owner, pass through payments to subcontractors and shall reduce each subcontractor’s retainage in the same manner as the contractors retainage is reduced by the owner; provided, however, that the value of each subcontractor’s work complete and in place equals 50 percent of his or her subcontract value, including approved change orders and other additions to the subcontract value, provided, further, that the work of the subcontractor is proceeding satisfactorily and the subcontractor has provided or provides such satisfactory reasonable assurances of continued performance and financial responsibility to complete his or her work including any warranty work as the contractor in his or her reasonable discretion may require, including, but not limited to, a payment and performance bond.

The subcontractor shall, within ten days from the subcontractor’s receipt of retainage from the contractor, pass through payments to lower tier subcontractors and shall reduce each lower tier subcontractor’s retainage in the same manner as the subcontractors retainage is reduced by the contractor; provided, however, that the value of each lower tier subcontractor’s work complete and in place equals 50 percent of his or her subcontract value, including approved change orders and other additions to the subcontract value; provided, further, that the work of the lower tier subcontractor is proceeding satisfactorily and the lower tier subcontractor has provided or provides such satisfactory reasonable assurances of continued performance and financial responsibility to complete his or her work including any warranty work as the subcontractor in his or her reasonable discretion may require, including, but not limited to, a payment and performance bond.

This Code section shall not apply to:

Any contracts let by the Department of Transportation of this state for the construction, improvement, or maintenance of roads or highways in this state or purposes incidental thereto; or

Any contracts whose value or duration at the time of the award does not exceed $150,000.00 or 45 days in duration.

Contract and subcontract provisions inconsistent with the benefits extended to contractors, subcontractors, and lower tier subcontractors by this Code section shall be unenforceable; provided, however, that nothing in this Code section shall render unenforceable any contract or subcontract provisions allowing greater benefits to be extended to such contractors, subcontractors, or lower tier subcontractors, the provisions and benefits of this Code section being minimal only.

Nothing shall preclude a payor under this Code section, prior to making a payment, from requiring the payee to submit satisfactory evidence that all payrolls, material bills, and other indebtedness connected with the work have been paid.

Only state or national banks chartered within the State of Georgia may serve as an escrow agent;

The escrow agent must limit the investment of funds of the contractor held in escrow in lieu of retained amounts provided for in Code Section 13-10-81 to negotiable certificates of deposits issued by any state or national bank in the State of Georgia (including, but not limited to, certificates of deposit issued by the bank acting as escrow agent) registered in the name of the escrow agent as such under escrow agreement with the contractor;

As interest on certificates of deposit held in escrow becomes due, it shall be collected by the escrow agent and paid to the contractor;

The escrow agent shall promptly acknowledge to the appropriate fiscal officer the amount and value of the escrow account held by the escrow agent, and any additions to the escrow account shall be reported immediately. Withdrawals from the escrow account shall only be made subject to the written approval of the fiscal officer of the department, agency, or instrumentality of the state or any political subdivision entering into the contract;

Upon default or overpayment of any contract subject to the procedure provided for in this Code section and upon the written demand of the fiscal officer provided for in paragraph (4) of this subsection, the escrow agent shall within ten days deliver a certified check to the appropriate fiscal officer in the amount of the escrow account balance relating to the contract in default;

The escrow account may be terminated upon completion and acceptance of the contract as provided for in Code Section 13-10-81;

All fees and expenses of the escrow agent shall be paid by the contractor to the escrow agent and, if not paid, shall constitute a lien on the interest accruing to the escrow account and shall be paid therefrom;

The escrow account shall constitute a specific pledge to the state or any political subdivision and the contractor shall not, except to his or her surety, otherwise assign, pledge, discount, sell, or transfer his or her interest in said escrow account, the funds of which shall not be subject to levy, garnishment, attachment, or any other process whatsoever; and

The form of the escrow agreement and provisions thereof in compliance with this Code section, as well as such other provisions as the appropriate fiscal officer shall from time to time prescribe, shall be subject to written approval of the fiscal officer. The approval of the escrow agreement by the appropriate fiscal officer shall authorize the escrow agent to accept appointment in such capacity.

History.
Code 1981, §13-10-80, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 1.

13-10-81.
Authorization and procedure for retention of contractual payments by state or political subdivisions; procedure for final payment.

Any department, agency, or instrumentality of the state or any political subdivision of the state is authorized to insert in the specifications of all contracts relating to the installation, extension, improvement, maintenance, or repair of any water or sewer facility a clause providing for the retention of amounts not exceeding 10 percent of the gross value of the completed work as may be provided for in the contract; provided, however, that no amounts shall be retained on estimates or progress payments submitted after 50 percent of the work on the project has been completed if in the opinion of the department, agency, or instrumentality of the state or any political subdivision thereof such work is satisfactory and has been completed on schedule. This will not affect the retained amounts on the first 50 percent of the work on the project which may continue to be held to ensure satisfactory completion of the project. If, after discontinuing the retention, the department, agency, or instrumentality of the state or any political subdivision thereof determines that the work is unsatisfactory or has fallen behind schedule, retention may be resumed at the previous level. Retainage shall be invested at the current market rate and any interest earned on the retained amount by such department, agency, or instrumentality of the state or any political subdivision of the state shall be paid to the contractor when the project has been completed within the time limits specified and for the price specified in the contract, or in any amendments or change orders approved in accord with the terms of the contract, as certified pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section.

Final payment of the retained amounts to the contractor under the contract to which the retained amounts relate shall be made after certification by the engineer in charge of the project covered by the contract that the work has been satisfactorily completed and is accepted in accordance with the contract, plans, and specifications. Payment to the contractor of interest earned on the retained amounts shall be made after certification by the engineer in charge of the project covered by the contract that the work has been completed within the time specified and within the price specified in the contract.

At substantial completion of the work and as the governmental entity’s authorized contract representative determines the work to be reasonably satisfactory, the governmental entity shall within 30 days after invoice and other appropriate documentation as may be required by the contract documents are provided pay the retainage to the contractor. If at that time there are any remaining incomplete minor items, an amount equal to 200 percent of the value of each item as determined by the governmental entity’s authorized contract representative shall be withheld until such item or items are completed.

History.
Ga. L. 1975, p. 1045, § 1; Code 1981, §13-10-20; Ga. L. 1983, p. 475, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2091, § 1; Code 1981, §13-10-81, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 1.

13-10-82.
Authorization and procedure for creation and maintenance of escrow accounts by state or political subdivisions.

In lieu of the retained amounts provided for in Code Section 13-10-81, any department, agency, or instrumentality of the state or any political subdivision of the state is authorized to insert a clause in the specifications of all contracts provided for in Code Section 13-10-81, providing for an alternate procedure for the maintenance of an escrow account in an amount at least equal to the amount authorized to be retained by the contract.

Any such escrow agreement entered into pursuant to this Code section must contain as a minimum the following provisions:

The department, agency, or instrumentality of the state or political subdivision of this state shall not be liable to the contractor or his or her surety for the failure of the escrow agent to perform under the escrow agreement or for the failure of any bank to honor certificates of deposit issued by it which are held in the escrow account.

History.
Ga. L. 1975, p. 1045, §§ 2, 3; Code 1981, §13-10-21; Code 1981, §13-10-82, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 1.

13-10-83.
Construction of provisions of article.

Nothing in this article shall be construed or deemed to affect any contract covered by the provisions of Code Sections 32-2-75 through 32-2-77.

History.
Ga. L. 1975, p. 1045, § 4; Code 1981, §13-10-22; Code 1981, §13-10-83, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 1.